Maine, session 132, LD917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1718-G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 28, Pt. A, §2, is amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§1718-G. Requirements for notice to patients of costs for COVID-19 screening and
testing and prohibited charges for COVID-19 vaccination for uninsured
patients
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1718-G, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 28, Pt. A, §2, is
repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR0782(02)